Tennessee, session 114, HB1738.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 15, Chapter 2, is amended by adding
the following new section:
The month of April of each year is hereby designated as "Tennessee Native
Plant Month" in this state.
HB1738
011348
- 1 -

SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011348